Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.220

Void in candidacy for water-sewer districts—Fewer than one hundred residents.

A void in candidacy in a water-sewer district with fewer than one hundred residents may be filled in accordance with RCW 57.12.035.

[ 2007 c 383 s 2.]